Idaho statutes. Title 14 ESTATES OF DECEDENTS
Chapter 4
ESTATE AND TRANSFER TAX

Sec.

§ 14-401. Short title. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-402. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-403. Residents — Tax imposed

Credit for tax paid other state. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-404. Nonresidents — Tax imposed

Exemption. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-404A. Special use valuation

Recapture. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-405. Tax returns — Date to be filed

Extensions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-406. Date payment due — Date deemed received

Interest. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-407. Amended returns

Final determination. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-408. Refund for overpayments

Limitation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-409. Tax as lien — Instruments issued upon payment — Certificate of transfer

Liens on special use property. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-410. Personal representative — Payment of tax — Sale of property

Liability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-411. Personal representative — Final account

Approval by commission. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-412. Administration and enforcement by commission. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-413. Distribution of receipts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 14-414. Receipt for payment of tax

Distribution prohibited until tax is paid. [Repealed.]

§ 14-415. Refund of tax. [Repealed.]

§ 14-416 — 14-418. Inspection of books — Restrictions on stock transfers — Inheritance tax determination. [Repealed.]

§ 14-419 — 14-423. Venue — Appraisement — Procedures for determining tax on certain transactions — Appeal from order fixing tax — Orders, decrees and judgments. [Repealed.]

§ 14-424 — 14-428. Copies of papers and orders to be furnished — Collection of taxes — Fees, compensation and expenses — Penalties. [Repealed.]

§ 14-429. Fees of commissioner of finance. [Repealed.]

§ 14-430. Severability. [Repealed.]